Louisiana, session 2026, SB264.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:930(G)(1)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§930. Anesthetics; authority to administer; penalty
* * *
G.(1) The Louisiana Legislature hereby finds that:
(a) Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetists (CRNAs) have been selecting and
administering anesthesia in Louisiana and the United States for over more than one
hundred years.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-529 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 264